District of Columbia statutes.
29-704.05

Actions by and against partnership and partners.

(a)

To the extent not inconsistent with § 29-704.04, a general partner may be joined in an action against the limited partnership or named in a separate action.

(b)

A judgment against a limited partnership shall not by itself be a judgment against a general partner. A judgment against a limited partnership shall not be satisfied from a general partner’s assets unless there is also a judgment against the general partner.

(c)

A judgment creditor of a general partner shall not levy execution against the assets of the general partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the limited partnership, unless the partner is personally liable for the claim under § 29-704.04 and:

(1)

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the limited partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

(2)

The limited partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

(3)

The general partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust limited partnership assets;

(4)

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a general partner based on a finding that limited partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of limited partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court’s equitable powers; or

(5)

Liability is imposed on the general partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the limited partnership.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 405 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).